Hawaii statutes.
§651-48 Same, penalty. Any owner or
holder of any certificate of stock which has been levied upon by virtue of an
execution who sells or otherwise voluntarily disposes of the certificate of
stock without consent of the judgment creditor, or order of the court, or who,
upon demand of the levying officer, refuses to surrender the certificate of
stock, except to assert or maintain the owner's or holder's rights as a
pledgee, shall be fined not more than $1,000 or imprisoned not more than one
year, or both. [L 1927, c 269, pt of §1; RL 1935, §4151; RL 1945, §10178; RL
1955, §233-47; HRS §651-48; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next